Massachusetts, session 194th, H137.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The first paragraph of MGL 128 Section 1a shall be amended to include the phrase “the
growing and cultivation of both hemp and marijuana,” after the phrase “floricultural or
horticultural commodities”.
of 1